Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202081-3133.01
Division of Behavioral Health; strategic plan; key goals; benchmarks; progress reports.

(1) For the biennium ending June 30, 2017, and the biennium ending June 30, 2019, the Division of Behavioral Health of the Department of Health and Human Services shall, as part of the appropriations request process pursuant to subsection (1) of section 81-132, include a strategic plan that identifies the main purpose or purposes of each program, verifiable and auditable key goals that the division believes are fair measures of its progress in meeting each program's main purpose or purposes, and benchmarks for improving performance on the key goals. The division shall also report whether the benchmarks are being met and, if not, the expected timeframes for meeting them. Such key goals and benchmarks shall be developed by the division with the assistance of the budget division of the Department of Administrative Services pursuant to subdivision (3) of section 81-1113.

(2) Not later than September 15, 2015, and not later than September 15, 2017, the Division of Behavioral Health of the Department of Health and Human Services shall report electronically to the Health and Human Services Committee of the Legislature and the Appropriations Committee of the Legislature on the progress towards the key goals identified pursuant to this section that occurred in the previous twelve months. The division shall annually appear at a joint hearing of the two legislative committees and present the report.

Laws 2014, LB974, § 12;

Laws 2016, LB1092, § 8.